Colorado statutes. TITLE 41 Aeronautics: Aircraft and Airports
PART 2
AIRPORTS - CITIES AND TOWNS

41-4-201. Power to establish airports.

The city councils and boards of trustees in towns have the power to acquire, establish, construct, own, control, lease, equip, improve, maintain, operate, and regulate airports and landing fields for the use of airplanes and other aircraft either within or without such municipalities or may set apart and use for such purpose real property owned by such cities and towns. Any lands previously acquired by any town or city in the state of Colorado for park purposes may be used for any of the purposes specified in this section. On any airports so established, city councils and boards of trustees in towns shall grant no exclusive concession, license, or lease agreement relating to the business of servicing, repairing, or furnishing supplies for aircraft.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 788, § 1.

CSA:

C. 163, § 42.

L. 47:

p. 877, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 139-55-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 139-55-1.

Cross references:

For joint action with counties, see § 41-4-103.

41-4-202. How lands acquired.

Real property needed by a city or town for an airport or landing field shall be acquired by purchase if the city or town is able to agree with the owners on the terms thereof and otherwise by condemnation in the manner provided by law for acquiring real property for public purposes.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 788, § 2.

CSA:

C. 163, § 43.

CRS 53:

§ 139-55-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 139-55-2.

Cross references:

For condemnation proceedings, see articles 1 to 7 of title 38.

41-4-203. Power to incur indebtedness and issue bonds.

The city councils or boards of trustees in towns have the power to incur indebtedness for any of the purposes mentioned in this part 2 and to issue bonds for the acquisition, construction, and improvements of airports and landing fields and appurtenances thereto, in the same form and manner as debt is incurred and bonds are issued for other municipal purposes.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 789, § 3.

CSA:

C. 163, § 44.

CRS 53:

§ 139-55-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 139-55-3.

Cross references:

For the constitutional provision that establishes limitations on the incurring of debt, see § 20 of article X, Colorado Constitution; for authority of local governments to contract debts, see § 6 of article XI, Colorado Constitution; for general authority of cities and towns to issue bonds, see article 21 of title 31.

41-4-204. Jurisdiction to regulate use.

In connection with the erection or maintenance of any such airport or air navigation facilities, any city or town, or any municipal corporation, has the power and jurisdiction to regulate the receipt, deposit, and removal and the embarkation of passengers or property to and from such landing places or moorage as may be provided; to exact and require charges, fees, and tolls, together with a lien to enforce their payment; to lease or assign for operation such space or area, appurtenances, appliances, or other conveniences necessary or useful in connection therewith; to own and operate municipal aircraft; to employ pilots; to provide rules and regulations covering the use of such airport and facilities and the use of other property or means of transportation within or over the airport; to perform any duties necessary or convenient for the regulation of air traffic; to enter into contracts or otherwise cooperate with the federal government or other public or private agencies; and otherwise to exercise such powers as may be required or convenient in the promotion of aeronautics and the furtherance of commerce and navigation by air.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 789, § 4.

CSA:

C. 163, § 45.

CRS 53:

§ 139-55-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 139-55-4.

41-4-205. Funds may be raised by taxation.

The city council or board of trustees may annually appropriate and cause to be raised by taxation in such city or town a sum sufficient to carry out the provisions of this part 2.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 790, § 5.

CSA:

C. 163, § 46.

CRS 53:

§ 139-55-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 139-55-5.